Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0804.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 212 FREESTANDING HYPERBARIC OXYGEN THERAPY FACILITIES Sec. 21201. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Accreditation organization" means an organization that is approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to survey and certify health facilities or agencies, including, but not limited to, the Joint Commission, the Healthcare Facilities Accreditation Program, Det Norske Veritas or DNV, the Center for Improvement of Health Care Quality, or another nationally recognized organization that adheres to evidence-based safety and clinical process guidelines and peer-reviewed, evidence-based practices, as determined by the department. (b) "Medical director" means an individual who is appointed by a freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility as medical director pursuant to section 21213. (c) "NFPA 99" means the "Health Care Facilities Code", 2024 edition, developed by the National Fire Protection Association. (d) "Qualified health professional" means any of the following: (i) An individual who is licensed as a physician or physician's assistant under part 170, 175, or 180. (ii) An individual who is licensed as a registered professional nurse under part 172 who has been granted a specialty certification as a nurse practitioner by the Michigan board of nursing under section 17210. (e) "Safety coordinator" means an individual who is appointed by a freestanding hyperbaric oxygen therapy facility as safety coordinator pursuant to section 21313. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code, and part 201 contains definitions applicable to this part. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)    Senate Bill No. 803. (b)    Senate Bill No. 805. (c) Senate Bill No. 806.